District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.29

Repealed

Institutional good time.

Repealed.

Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 802, 41 DCR 2608
For temporary repeal of section, see § 802 (a) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
1981 Ed., § 24-428.